District of Columbia statutes.
1-631.01

Policy; issuance of rules and regulations.

All official personnel records of the District government shall be established, maintained, and disposed of in a manner designed to ensure the greatest degree of applicant or employee privacy while providing adequate, necessary, and complete information for the District to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter. Such records shall be established, maintained, and disposed of in accordance with rules and regulations issued by the Mayor.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3101, 25 DCR 5740
This section is referenced in § 1-631.07.
1981 Ed., § 1-632.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-361.1.